Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-3005
Director of Insurance; powers.

The Director of Insurance may, at his or her discretion, make an order:

(1) Limiting an insurer’s death master file comparisons required under section 44-3003 to the insurer’s electronic searchable files or approving a plan and timeline for conversion of the insurer’s files to electronic files;

(2) Exempting an insurer from death master file comparisons required under section 44-3003 or permitting an insurer to perform such comparisons on only certain policies or retained asset accounts or to perform such comparisons less frequently than semiannually upon a demonstration of hardship by the insurer; or

(3) Phasing in compliance with the Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act according to a plan adopted and published by the director.

Laws 2017, LB137, § 5.